Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1426
Licenses for sale of tobacco; fees inure to school fund.

All money collected as license fees under the provisions of sections 28-1420 to 28-1429, shall be paid over by the clerk or finance director receiving it to the treasurer of the school fund for the particular city, town, village or county, as the case may be.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 7, p. 403;

C.S.1922, § 9855;

C.S.1929, § 28-1029;

R.S.1943, § 28-1028;

Laws 1961, c. 128, § 3, p. 380;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1028, (1975).